Hawaii statutes.
§323D-46.2 Withdrawal of a certificate of
need. (a) After the issuance of a certificate of need, the state agency
shall periodically review the progress of the project. The state agency may
withdraw the certificate of need, if the state agency determines on the basis
of the review that:

(1) The holder of the certificate of need is not
meeting the timetable specified in the approved application for the certificate
of need and is not making a good faith effort to meet it; or

(2) The project being implemented differs
substantially from that which was approved by the state agency.

(b) The state agency may withdraw at any time
a certificate of need or an exemption from obtaining a certificate of need, if
the state agency determines that the applicant procured the certificate of need
or the exemption by fraud, misrepresentation, or corruption, or that the
applicant submitted or caused to be submitted to the state agency false
statements or information in connection with the application for the certificate
of need or the exemption.

(c) The state agency shall adopt rules in
conformity with chapter 91 for the withdrawal of certificates of need. [L 1980,
c 75, §20]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next